Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-164
Compensation court; rules and regulations.

The Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall regulate and provide the kind and character of notices and the services thereof and, in case of an injury by accident to an employee, the nature and extent of the proofs and evidence and the method of taking and furnishing the same for the establishment of the right to compensation. It shall determine the nature and form or forms of the application of those claiming to be entitled to benefits or compensation and shall regulate the method of making investigations, physical examinations, and inspections and prescribe the time within which adjudications and awards shall be made. Such rules and regulations shall conform to the provisions of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.

Laws 1917, c. 85, § 29, p. 220;

C.S.1922, § 3080;

C.S.1929, § 48-157;

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 36, p. 205;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-157;

R.S.1943, § 48-164;

Laws 1945, c. 113, § 5, p. 365;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 97;

Laws 2023, LB191, § 9.

For service of documents upon adverse party or attorney, see section 25-534.